Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,118
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that the area adjacent to the Interstate 80 corridor running through the entire length of Nebraska affords an excellent opportunity for business expansion, economic development, job creation, and education-business partnerships. The Legislature further declares that this opportunity is best realized through regional cooperation in which the communities, businesses, and educational entities in the corridor work together to pursue common goals within opportunity zones. The Department of Economic Development is encouraged to work with interested parties within the corridor to create opportunity zones similar to the one established in section 81-12,123.

Laws 2005, LB 546, § 2.
December 31, 2010